Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.3. Stormwater Management Act.

Editor’s note.

This article head has been amended by 2016, cc. 68 and 758 to read “Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Act” effective on July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

§ 62.1-44.15:24.
(For expiration date, see notes) Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Agreement in lieu of a stormwater management plan”
means a contract between the VSMP authority and the owner or permittee that specifies methods that shall be implemented to comply with the requirements of a VSMP for the construction of a single-family residence; such contract may be executed by the VSMP authority in lieu of a stormwater management plan.

“Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act land-disturbing activity”
means a land-disturbing activity including clearing, grading, or excavation that results in a land disturbance equal to or greater than 2,500 square feet and less than one acre in all areas of jurisdictions designated as subject to the regulations adopted pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation provisions of this chapter.

“CWA”
means the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), formerly referred to as the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, P.L. 92-500, as amended by P.L. 95-217, P.L. 95-576, P.L. 96-483, and P.L. 97-117, or any subsequent revisions thereto.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Flooding”
means a volume of water that is too great to be confined within the banks or walls of the stream, water body, or conveyance system and that overflows onto adjacent lands, thereby causing or threatening damage.

“Land disturbance”
or

“land-disturbing activity”

means a man-made change to the land surface that potentially changes its runoff characteristics including clearing, grading, or excavation, except that the term shall not include those exemptions specified in §

62.1-44.15:34

.

“Municipal separate storm sewer”
means a conveyance or system of conveyances otherwise known as a municipal separate storm sewer system or “MS4,” including roads with drainage systems, municipal streets, catch basins, curbs, gutters, ditches, man-made channels, or storm drains:

Owned or operated by a federal, state, city, town, county, district, association, or other public body, created by or pursuant to state law, having jurisdiction or delegated authority for erosion and sediment control and stormwater management, or a designated and approved management agency under § 208 of the CWA that discharges to surface waters;

Designed or used for collecting or conveying stormwater;

That is not a combined sewer; and

That is not part of a publicly owned treatment works.“Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System Management Program” means a management program covering the duration of a state permit for a municipal separate storm sewer system that includes a comprehensive planning process that involves public participation and intergovernmental coordination, to reduce the discharge of pollutants to the maximum extent practicable, to protect water quality, and to satisfy the appropriate water quality requirements of the CWA and regulations, and this article and its attendant regulations, using management practices, control techniques, and system, design, and engineering methods, and such other provisions that are appropriate.“Nonpoint source pollution” means pollution such as sediment, nitrogen, phosphorus, hydrocarbons, heavy metals, and toxics whose sources cannot be pinpointed but rather are washed from the land surface in a diffuse manner by stormwater runoff.“Peak flow rate” means the maximum instantaneous flow from a prescribed design storm at a particular location.“Permit” or “VSMP authority permit” means an approval to conduct a land-disturbing activity issued by the VSMP authority for the initiation of a land-disturbing activity after evidence of state VSMP general permit coverage has been provided where applicable.“Permittee” means the person to which the permit or state permit is issued.“Runoff volume” means the volume of water that runs off the land development project from a prescribed storm event.“Rural Tidewater locality” means any locality that is (i) subject to the provisions of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) and (ii) eligible to join the Rural Coastal Virginia Community Enhancement Authority established by Chapter 76 (§

15.2-7600

et seq.) of Title 15.2.“State permit” means an approval to conduct a land-disturbing activity issued by the Board in the form of a state stormwater individual permit or coverage issued under a state general permit or an approval issued by the Board for stormwater discharges from an MS4. Under these permits, the Commonwealth imposes and enforces requirements pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act and regulations and this article and its attendant regulations.“Stormwater” means precipitation that is discharged across the land surface or through conveyances to one or more waterways and that may include stormwater runoff, snow melt runoff, and surface runoff and drainage.“Stormwater management plan” means a document containing material describing methods for complying with the requirements of a VSMP.“Subdivision” means the same as defined in §

15.2-2201

.“Virginia Stormwater Management Program” or “VSMP” means a program approved by the Soil and Water Conservation Board after September 13, 2011, and until June 30, 2013, or the State Water Control Board on and after June 30, 2013, that has been established by a VSMP authority to manage the quality and quantity of runoff resulting from land-disturbing activities and shall include such items as local ordinances, rules, permit requirements, annual standards and specifications, policies and guidelines, technical materials, and requirements for plan review, inspection, enforcement, where authorized in this article, and evaluation consistent with the requirements of this article and associated regulations.“Virginia Stormwater Management Program authority” or “VSMP authority” means an authority approved by the Board after September 13, 2011, to operate a Virginia Stormwater Management Program or the Department. An authority may include a locality; state entity, including the Department; federal entity; or, for linear projects subject to annual standards and specifications in accordance with subsection B of §

62.1-44.15:31

, electric, natural gas, and telephone utility companies, interstate and intrastate natural gas pipeline companies, railroad companies, or authorities created pursuant to §

15.2-5102

.“Water quality volume” means the volume equal to the first one-half inch of runoff multiplied by the impervious surface of the land development project.“Water quantity technical criteria” means standards set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to this article that establish minimum design criteria for measures to control localized flooding and stream channel erosion.“Watershed” means a defined land area drained by a river or stream, karst system, or system of connecting rivers or streams such that all surface water within the area flows through a single outlet. In karst areas, the karst feature to which water drains may be considered the single outlet for the watershed.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.2; 1991, c. 84; 1994, cc. 605, 898; 2004, c. 372; 2006, cc. 21, 171; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598; 2018, cc. 154, 155.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:24

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 6 provides: “Regulations of the regulatory boards served by (i) the Department of Labor and Industry pursuant to Title 40.1 and (ii) the Department of Professional and Occupational Regulation or the Department of Health Professions pursuant to Title 54.1 that are limited to reducing fees charged to regulants and applicants.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 7 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to administer and implement the Virginia Stormwater Management Act ( § 10.1-603.1 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§ 10.1- 560 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§ 10.1- 2100 et seq. of the Code of Virginia) are transferred from the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to the State Water Control Board, and the State Water Control Board may amend, modify, or delete provisions in these regulations in order to implement this act. Such regulations shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the State Water Control Board.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 8 provides: “That the initial actions of the State Water Control Board to adopt, with necessary amendments, the regulations implementing the programs being transferred by this act from the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to the State Water Control Board shall be exempt from Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. After transfer of the programs, if the State Water Control Board determines that additional amendments to the regulations are necessary solely to enable implementation of the programs in accordance with this act, the regulatory actions necessary shall be exempt from Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, except that the Department of Environmental Quality shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulatory actions.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 9 provides: “That any regulatory action initiated by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to amend the programs being transferred by this act may be continued by the State Water Control Board at the time of the program transfer and that the State Water Control Board shall act expeditiously to address all such actions.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 10 provides: “That the full-time employees and the total maximum employment level employed in the administration of the programs being transferred by this act shall be transferred from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Department of Environmental Quality. The Department of Conservation and Recreation is directed to transfer to the Department of Environmental Quality all appropriations, including special funds, for programs identified for transfer by this act. The Department of Environmental Quality is authorized to hire additional staff to operate the programs transferred by this act.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 11 provides: “That 30 days prior to (i) the transfer of any full-time employees and total maximum employment level employed in the administration of the programs being transferred by this act, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall report to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources on such transfers and (ii) the transfer of appropriations, including special funds, for programs identified for transfer in this act, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall report on such transfers. By December 1, 2013, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall also report on the process by which the Department of Environmental Quality will distribute funds to local soil and water conservation districts as provided for in § 319 of the federal Clean Water Act and § 6217 of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 12 provides: “That the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and members of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, appointed by their respective Chairs, shall convene public meetings throughout the Commonwealth to evaluate the role of soil and water conservation districts in providing effective delivery of water quality services and technical assistance. In their deliberations the representatives of the executive branch agencies and legislators shall:

“A. Discuss the provisions of this act and its implications and solicit comments from the public and affected parties;

“B. Determine the extent of the role soil and water conservation districts should play in providing assistance in delivery of water quality services for nonpoint source pollution management and providing technical assistance for such programs as erosion and sediment control and stormwater management; and

“C. Determine whether the mission of soil and water conservation districts is more effectively delivered under the current statutory framework or whether organizational changes would enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of such services.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 13 provides: “That guidance of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, and the former Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board relating to programs to be transferred by this act shall remain in effect until amended or repealed.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 14 provides: “That the Secretary of Natural Resources, working with the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, shall take steps to enhance collaboration and communication among the natural resources agencies to ensure the effective and efficient implementation of the Commonwealth’s water quality and soil and water conservation programs.”

Acts
2014, cc. 303 and
598, cl. 2 provides: “That amendments to regulations of the State Water Control Board necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.), provided that there is a public comment period of at least 30 days on the proposed amendments prior to Board adoption.”

Acts
2014, cc. 303 and
598, cl. 3 provides: “That the consolidation into Virginia’s General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities of state post-construction requirements exceeding minimum federal requirements shall not be construed to modify the scope of federal agency or citizen suit enforcement pursuant to the Clean Water Act ( 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.).”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 303, effective March 24, 2014, and c. 598, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and added the definition of “Agreement in lieu of a stormwater management plan”; and deleted “until such approval is given” and made minor stylistic changes in the definition of “Virginia Stormwater Management Program authority.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 154 added the definitions for “Rural Tidewater locality” and “Water quantity technical criteria.”

The 2018 amendment by c. 155 added the definition for “Rural Tidewater locality.”

The 2018 amendments by cc. 154 and 155, added the definition for “Rural Tidewater locality.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-572. Storm Water Management Agreement, etc.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Stormwater fee. —

The stormwater fee set forth in a city code to recoup costs associated with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program is a service fee rather than a tax, and the United States Navy is not constitutionally exempt from paying the fee. See opinion of Attorney General to Ronald S. Hallman, Esq., Chesapeake City Attorney, 09-098, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (3/4/10).

Restrictions on use of fertilizer. —

Virginia locality is authorized by § 10.1-603.7 and §

15.2-924.1

to adopt an ordinance regulating or prohibiting the use or application of fertilizers within its jurisdictional boundaries provided the locality makes the factual findings required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7 and determines that the ordinance is necessary to prevent any further degradation to water resources or to address specific existing water pollution. The locality also must comply with the public hearing procedures required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7. See opinion of Attorney General to James E. Barnett, Esq., York County Attorney, 09-035, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 55 (9/1/09).

Riparian landowners. —

The provisions of the Virginia Scenic Rivers Act do not apply to riparian landowners constructing dams, docks, or other structures that could impede water flow along tributaries of designated waterways unless those tributaries are included within the scope of the designation. The Scenic Rivers Act does not impose any restrictions on a riparian landowner’s management of surface water on his land abutting a designated waterway, and accordingly that a riparian landowner may engage in grading, plowing, timbering, or otherwise develop his property in a manner that might impede the flow of surface water across his property into a designated scenic river. See opinion of Attorney General to C. Eric Young, Esquire, Tazewell County Attorney, 17-037, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 28 (12/7/17).

§ 62.1-44.15:24.
(For effective date, see notes) Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Agreement in lieu of a plan”
means a contract between the VESMP authority or the Board acting as a VSMP authority and the owner or permittee that specifies methods that shall be implemented to comply with the requirements of this article for the construction of a single-family detached residential structure; such contract may be executed by the VESMP authority in lieu of a soil erosion control and stormwater management plan or by the Board acting as a VSMP authority in lieu of a stormwater management plan.

“Applicant”
means any person submitting a soil erosion control and stormwater management plan to a VESMP authority, or a stormwater management plan to the Board when it is serving as a VSMP authority, for approval in order to obtain authorization to commence a land-disturbing activity.

“CWA”
means the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), formerly referred to as the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, P.L. 92-500, as amended by P.L. 95-217, P.L. 95-576, P.L. 96-483, and P.L. 97-117, or any subsequent revisions thereto.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Erosion impact area”
means an area of land that is not associated with a current land-disturbing activity but is subject to persistent soil erosion resulting in the delivery of sediment onto neighboring properties or into state waters. This definition shall not apply to any lot or parcel of land of 10,000 square feet or less used for residential purposes or any shoreline where the erosion results from wave action or other coastal processes.

“Flooding”
means a volume of water that is too great to be confined within the banks or walls of the stream, water body, or conveyance system and that overflows onto adjacent lands, thereby causing or threatening damage.

“Land disturbance”
or

“land-disturbing activity”

means a man-made change to the land surface that may result in soil erosion or has the potential to change its runoff characteristics, including construction activity such as the clearing, grading, excavating, or filling of land.

“Land-disturbance approval”
means the same as that term is defined in §

62.1-44.3

.

“Municipal separate storm sewer”
or

“MS4”

means the same as that term is defined in §

62.1-44.3

.

“Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System Management Program”
means a management program covering the duration of a permit for a municipal separate storm sewer system that includes a comprehensive planning process that involves public participation and intergovernmental coordination, to reduce the discharge of pollutants to the maximum extent practicable, to protect water quality, and to satisfy the appropriate water quality requirements of the CWA and regulations, and this article and its attendant regulations, using management practices, control techniques, and system, design, and engineering methods, and such other provisions that are appropriate.

“Natural channel design concepts”
means the utilization of engineering analysis and fluvial geomorphic processes to create, rehabilitate, restore, or stabilize an open conveyance system for the purpose of creating or recreating a stream that conveys its bankfull storm event within its banks and allows larger flows to access its bankfull bench and its floodplain.

“Nonpoint source pollution”
means pollution such as sediment, nitrogen, phosphorus, hydrocarbons, heavy metals, and toxics whose sources cannot be pinpointed but rather are washed from the land surface in a diffuse manner by stormwater.

“Owner”
means the same as that term is defined in §

62.1-44.3

. For a regulated land-disturbing activity that does not require a permit, “owner” also means the owner or owners of the freehold of the premises or lesser estate therein, mortgagee or vendee in possession, assignee of rents, receiver, executor, trustee, lessee, or other person, firm, or corporation in control of a property.

“Peak flow rate”
means the maximum instantaneous flow from a prescribed design storm at a particular location.

“Permit”
means a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (VPDES) permit issued by the Board pursuant to §

62.1-44.15

for stormwater discharges from a land-disturbing activity or MS4.

“Permittee”
means the person to whom the permit is issued.

“Runoff volume”
means the volume of water that runs off the land development project from a prescribed storm event.

“Rural Tidewater locality”
means any locality that is (i) subject to the provisions of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) and (ii) eligible to join the Rural Coastal Virginia Community Enhancement Authority established by Chapter 76 (§

15.2-7600

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

“Soil erosion”
means the movement of soil by wind or water into state waters or onto lands in the Commonwealth.

“Soil Erosion Control and Stormwater Management plan”
or

“plan”

means a document describing methods for controlling soil erosion and managing stormwater in accordance with the requirements adopted pursuant to this article.

“Stormwater,”
for the purposes of this article, means precipitation that is discharged across the land surface or through conveyances to one or more waterways and that may include stormwater runoff, snow melt runoff, and surface runoff and drainage.

“Stormwater management plan”
means a document containing material describing methods for complying with the requirements of a VSMP.

“Subdivision”
means the same as that term is defined in §

15.2-2201

.

“Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program”
or

“VESCP”

means a program approved by the Board that is established by a VESCP authority pursuant to Article 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) for the effective control of soil erosion, sediment deposition, and nonagricultural runoff associated with a land-disturbing activity to prevent the unreasonable degradation of properties, stream channels, waters, and other natural resources. The VESCP shall include, where applicable, such items as local ordinances, rules, policies and guidelines, technical materials, and requirements for plan review, inspection, and evaluation consistent with the requirements of Article 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.).

“Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program authority”
or

“VESCP authority”

means a locality that is approved by the Board to operate a Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program in accordance with Article 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.). Only a locality for which the Department administered a Virginia Stormwater Management Program as of July 1, 2017, is authorized to choose to operate a VESCP pursuant to Article 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.).

“Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Program”
or

“VESMP”

means a program established by a VESMP authority for the effective control of soil erosion and sediment deposition and the management of the quality and quantity of runoff resulting from land-disturbing activities to prevent the unreasonable degradation of properties, stream channels, waters, and other natural resources. The program shall include such items as local ordinances, rules, requirements for permits and land-disturbance approvals, policies and guidelines, technical materials, and requirements for plan review, inspection, and enforcement consistent with the requirements of this article.

“Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Program authority”
or

“VESMP authority”

means the Board or a locality approved by the Board to operate a Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Program. For state agency or federal entity land-disturbing activities and land-disturbing activities subject to approved standards and specifications, the Board shall serve as the VESMP authority.

“Virginia Stormwater Management Program”
or

“VSMP”

means a program established by the Board pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27.1

on behalf of a locality on or after July 1, 2014, to manage the quality and quantity of runoff resulting from any land-disturbing activity that (i) disturbs one acre or more of land or (ii) disturbs less than one acre of land and is part of a larger common plan of development or sale that results in one acre or more of land disturbance.

“Virginia Stormwater Management Program authority”
or

“VSMP authority”

means the Board when administering a VSMP on behalf of a locality that, pursuant to subdivision B 3 of §

62.1-44.15:27

, has chosen not to adopt and administer a VESMP.

“Water quality technical criteria”
means standards set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to this article that establish minimum design criteria for measures to control nonpoint source pollution.

“Water quantity technical criteria”
means standards set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to this article that establish minimum design criteria for measures to control localized flooding and stream channel erosion.

“Watershed”
means a defined land area drained by a river or stream, karst system, or system of connecting rivers or streams such that all surface water within the area flows through a single outlet. In karst areas, the karst feature to which water drains may be considered the single outlet for the watershed.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.2; 1991, c. 84; 1994, cc. 605, 898; 2004, c. 372; 2006, cc. 21, 171; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598; 2016, cc. 68, 758; 2018, cc. 154, 155.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:24

.

Editor’s note.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and substituted “Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Act (VESMA)” for “Stormwater Management Act” in the article heading. For effective date, see notes.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and rewrote the section. For effective date, see notes.